District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.08

Commitments to Washington Asylum and Jail.

Whenever and wherever authority of law exists to sentence, commit, order committed, or confine any person to or in the Jail of the District of Columbia or the Washington Asylum of said District, said authority shall be exercised by sentence, commitment, order of commitment, or confinement to or in said Washington Asylum and Jail.

Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 1003, ch. 192

History

1981 Ed., § 24-408.
1973 Ed., § 24-408.

Prior Codifications